Utah statutes.
7-17-10.   Applicability of act to accounts and actions thereon.

The provisions of this act shall apply:

(1)  to all reserve accounts; and

(2)  to all actions filed after January 1, 1979, to recover interest on or other compensation for the use of the funds in any reserve account whether or not the reserve accounts were established prior to or subsequent to July 1, 1979.

